apertium-oss.oss.dix
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="ӕд__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="онг__post">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="post"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="ӕмӕ__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="куы__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="кӕм__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ӕд"><i>ӕд</i><par n="ӕд__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕнӕ"><i>ӕнӕ</i><par n="ӕд__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="онг"><i>онг</i><par n="онг__post"/></e>
    <e lm="цур"><i>цур</i><par n="онг__post"/></e>
    <e lm="сӕр"><i>сӕр</i><par n="онг__post"/></e>
    <e lm="руаджы"><i>руаджы</i><par n="онг__post"/></e>
    <e lm="фӕрсы"><i>фӕрсы</i><par n="онг__post"/></e>
    <e lm="уӕлхъус"><i>уӕлхъус</i><par n="онг__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕмӕ"><i>ӕмӕ</i><par n="ӕмӕ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="дӕр"><i>дӕр</i><par n="ӕмӕ__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="куы"><i>куы</i><par n="куы__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕмӕ"><i>ӕмӕ</i><par n="куы__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="кӕм"><i>кӕм</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="кӕдӕм"><i>кӕдӕм</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="кӕцӕй"><i>кӕцӕй</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="уӕлӕ"><i>уӕлӕ</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="разӕй"><i>разӕй</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="мидӕг"><i>мидӕг</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="бынӕй"><i>бынӕй</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="фалӕ"><i>фалӕ</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ам"><i>ам</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ардӕм"><i>ардӕм</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ардыфӕй"><i>ардыфӕй</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="мӕнӕ"><i>мӕнӕ</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="дӕлӕ"><i>дӕлӕ</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="фӕсте"><i>фӕсте</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕддӕ"><i>ӕддӕ</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="уым"><i>уым</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="урдӕм"><i>урдӕм</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="урдыфӕй"><i>урдыфӕй</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="уӕртӕ"><i>уӕртӕ</i><par n="кӕм__adv"/></e>
